src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_LÄTYSKÄ

0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ_ARCHAIC  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;

0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ
!! THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
!! 0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ_ARCHAIC  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

+Use/Marg:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
+Use/Marg:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;

:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;

:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;



LEXICON ADJ_MATALA

0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;

0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA_ARCHAIC  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:a  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_TERÄVÄ

:  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;
!! THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
!! 0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ_ARCHAIC  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;

:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;



LEXICON ADJ_HOIKKA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 k~0 a:e comparative
!!€  hoikka: hoikka+A+Sg+Nom # slim
!!€  hoikkaa: hoikka+A+Sg+Par
!!€  hoikkana: hoikka+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  hoikassa: hoikka+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  hoikkina: hoikka+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  hoikissa: hoikka+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  hoikkien: hoikka+A+Pl+Gen
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_MYKKÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 k~0 ä:e comparative
!!€  mykkä: mykkä+A+Sg+Nom # mute
!!€  mykkää: mykkä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  mykkänä: mykkä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  mykässä: mykkä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  mykkinä: mykkä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  mykissä: mykkä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  mykkien: mykkä+A+Pl+Gen
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_POPPA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 p~0 a:e comparative
!!€  poppa: poppa+A+Sg+Nom # hocus-pocus
!!€  poppaa: poppa+A+Sg+Par
!!€  poppana: poppa+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  popassa: poppa+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  poppina: poppa+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  popissa: poppa+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  poppien: poppa+A+Pl+Gen
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_HÖMPPÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 p~0 ä:e comparative
!!€  hömppä: hömppä+A+Sg+Nom # bogus
!!€  hömppää: hömppä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  hömppänä: hömppä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  hömpässä: hömppä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  hömppinä: hömppä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  hömpissä: hömppä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  hömppien: hömppä+A+Pl+Gen
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  The quantitative k and t gradations are not found for adjectives with this
!!  a stem.

LEXICON ADJ_VOIPA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 p~v a:e comparative
!!€  voipa: voipa+A+Sg+Nom # capable
!!€  voipaa: voipa+A+Sg+Par
!!€  voipana: voipa+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  voivassa: voipa+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  voipina: voipa+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  voivissa: voipa+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  voipien: voipa+A+Pl+Gen
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:va  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:v  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ve  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:v  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_KÄYPÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 p~v ä:e comparative
!!€  käypä: käypä+A+Sg+Nom # "good enough"
!!€  käypää: käypä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  käypänä: käypä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  käyvässä: käypä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  käypinä: käypä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  käyvissä: käypä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  käypien: käypä+A+Pl+Gen
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:vä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:v  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ve  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:v  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  The t:d is missing from this a stem.

LEXICON ADJ_MÄTÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 t~d ä:e comparative
!!€  mätä: mätä+A+Sg+Nom # rotten
!!€  mätää: mätä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  mätänä: mätä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  mädässä: mätä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  mätinä: mätä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  mädissä: mätä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  mätien: mätä+A+Pl+Gen
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:dä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:d  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:d  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_SANKA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 k~g a:e comparative
!!€  sanka: sanka+A+Sg+Nom # ???
!!€  sankaa: sanka+A+Sg+Par
!!€  sankana: sanka+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  sangassa: sanka+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  sankina: sanka+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  sangissa: sanka+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  sankien: sanka+A+Pl+Gen
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ga  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:g  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
