src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJECTIVE
aikaansaapa+A:aikaansaa  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
auttava+A:auttav  ADJ_MATALA  ;
epäherkkä+A:epä#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
epätarkka+A:epä#tark  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
estävä+A:estäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
haarova+A:haarov  ADJ_MATALA  ;
hallanarka+A:hallan#ar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
hanakka+A:hanak  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
hankala+A:hankal  ADJ_MATALA  ;
herkkä+A:herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
hermoherkkä+A:hermoherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
hermoherkkä+A:hermo#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
hiipivä+A:hiipiv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
hintava+A:hintav  ADJ_MATALA  ;
houkka+A:houk  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
huokuva+A:huokuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
hupa+A:hu  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
hylkivä+A:hylkiv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
hyvinvoipa+A:hyvinvoi  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
hyvinvoipa+A:hyvin#voi  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
hyvänsuopa+A:hyvänsuo  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
hyvänsuopa+A:hyvän#suo  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
hyytävä+A:hyytäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
hyötyvä+A:hyötyv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
häälyvä+A:häälyv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
hömppä+A:hömp  ADJ_HÖMPPÄ  ;
ihmisarka+A:ihmis#ar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
istuva+A:istuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
itkevä+A:itkev  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
jyrkkä+A:jyrk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
jäntterä+A:jäntter  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
järkeenkäypä+A:järkeenkäy  ADJ_KÄYPÄ  ;
jäykkä+A:jäyk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
kaareva+A:kaarev  ADJ_MATALA  ;
kaikkivoipa+A:kaikkivoi  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
kattava+A:kattav  ADJ_MATALA  ;
kestävä+A:kestäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
kiittävä+A:kiittäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
kiriherkkä+A:kiriherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
kiriherkkä+A:kiri#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
kirkuva+A:kirkuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
kiverä+A:kiver  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
kiverä+A:kiver  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
kolkka+A:kolk  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
kumara+A:kumar  ADJ_MATALA  ;
kuuromykkä+A:kuuro#myk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
kylmänarka+A:kylmän#ar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
kysyvä+A:kysyv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
kärkevä+A:kärkev  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
käypä+A:käy  ADJ_KÄYPÄ  ;
laatuunkäypä+A:laatuunkäy  ADJ_KÄYPÄ  ;
laulava+A:laulav  ADJ_MATALA  ;
lentävä+A:lentäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
liikaherkkä+A:liikaherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
likomärkä+A:likomär  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
luiseva+A:luisev  ADJ_MATALA  ;
lämpöherkkä+A:lämpöherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
läpimärkä+A:läpi#mär  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
lättänä+A:lättän  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
lättänä+A:lättän  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
lätyskä+A:lätysk  ADJ_LÄTYSKÄ  ;
menevä+A:menev  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
menoisa+A:menois  ADJ_MATALA  ;
muuttuva+A:muuttuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
mykkä+A:myk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
märkä+A:mär  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
mätä+A:mä  ADJ_MÄTÄ  ;
nähtävä+A:nähtäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
omantunnonarka+A:omantunnonar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
osuva+A:osuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
pahansuopa+A:pahansuo  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
pahansuopa+A:pahan#suo  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
pahansuopa+A:pahansuo  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
pahoinvoipa+A:pahoinvoi  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
pakkasenarka+A:pakkasen#ar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
parka+A:par  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
perivä+A:periv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
piukka+A:piuk  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
pohtiva+A:pohtiv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
poppa+A:pop  ADJ_POPPA  ;
puolijäykkä+A:puolijäyk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
pyylevä+A:pyylev  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
raaka+A:raa  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
rauhaisa+A:rauhais  ADJ_MATALA  ;
raukka+A:rauk  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
retevä+A:retev  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
räjähdysherkkä+A:räjähdysherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
salliva+A:salliv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
sanatarkka+A:sanatark  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
sanka+A:san  ADJ_SANKA  ;
seppä+A:sep  ADJ_HÖMPPÄ  ;
silkka+A:silk  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
sotiva+A:sotiv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
suhdanneherkkä+A:suhdanneherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
synkkä+A:synk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
syrjivä+A:syrjiv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
syöpä+A:syö  ADJ_KÄYPÄ  ;
säkkärä+A:säkkär  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
säkkärä+A:säkkär  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
säteilyarka+A:säteily#ar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
sävyisä+A:sävy#is  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
taantuva+A:taantuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
tiukka+A:tiuk  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
toistuva+A:toistuv  ADJ_MATALA  ;
tuliterä+A:tuliter  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
tuliterä+A:tuli#ter  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
tunneherkkä+A:tunne#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
tunnontarkka+A:tunnon#tark  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
turvaisa+A:turvais  ADJ_MATALA  ;
tuulenarka+A:tuulen#ar  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
tylppä+A:tylp  ADJ_HÖMPPÄ  ;
täpärä+A:täpär  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
uutuudenjäykkä+A:uutuuden#jäyk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
vaivaama+A:vaivaam  ADJ_MATALA  ;
valoherkkä+A:valo#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
valonherkkä+A:valon#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
vankka+A:vank  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
varvunhoikka+A:varvun#hoik  ADJ_HOIKKA  ;
veiterä+A:veiter  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
veiterä+A:veiter  ADJ_SÄKKÄRÄ  ;
vihlova+A:vihlov  ADJ_MATALA  ;
vikkelä+A:vikkel  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
voipa+A:voi  ADJ_VOIPA  ;
yliherkkä+A:yli#herk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
ylävä+A:yläv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
äkkijyrkkä+A:äkki#jyrk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
hössöttävä+A:hössöttäv  ADJ_TERÄVÄ  ;
itkunherkkä+A:itkunherk  ADJ_MYKKÄ  ;
